Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2249.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Biosolid." As follows:(1) Liquid or solid sludge or other residue from a municipal sewage collection and treatment system or from septic and holding tank pumpings from a commercial, institutional or residential establishment.(2) A material derived from sewage sludge.(3) The term does not include any of the following:(i) Ash generated during the firing of sewage sludge in a sewage sludge incinerator.(ii) Grit and screenings generated during the preliminary treatment of sewage sludge at a municipal sewage collection and treatment system.(iii) Grit, screenings and nonorganic objects from septic and holding tank pumpings.* * *Section 2. Section 104(17) and (18) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 104. Powers and duties of the department.The department in consultation with the Department of Health regarding matters of public health significance shall have the power and its duty shall be to:* * *(17) administer funds collected by the United States Government and granted to Pennsylvania for the purpose of closing, maintaining or monitoring abandoned or closed hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal sites and for the purpose of action to abate or prevent pollution at such 20260HB2249PN2940 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sites. If Congress has not authorized the collection of such funds within one year after the effective date of this act, or if the department finds that the funding program authorized is inadequate, the department shall transmit to the General Assembly within 15 months after the effective date of this act a proposal for the establishment of a fund in Pennsylvania comprised of surcharges collected from users of hazardous waste storage, treatment and disposal facilities excluding captive facilities in the Commonwealth. Such fund shall be proposed for the purpose of closing, maintaining or monitoring hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal sites excluding captive facilities which have been abandoned or which have been closed for at least 20 years, and for the purpose of taking action to abate or prevent pollution at such closed or abandoned sites; [and](18) encourage the beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste when the department determines that such use does not harm or present a threat of harm to the health, safety or welfare of the people or environment of this Commonwealth. The department shall establish waste regulations to effectuate the beneficial use of municipal and residual waste, including regulations for the issuance of general permits for any category of beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste on a regional or Statewide basis in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Environmental Quality Board. The department may or may not require insurance under section 502(e) or bonds under section 505(a) for any general permit or class of general permits promulgated under this paragraph. Except with the written approval of the department, no waste 20260HB2249PN2940 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be stored for longer than one year. Residual wastes being stored shall be monitored for changes in physical and chemical properties, including leachability, pursuant to applicable regulations, by the person or municipality beneficially using or processing such waste. The department may require the submission of periodic analyses or other information to insure that the quality of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed does not change. A municipality or person beneficially using or processing the residual waste shall immediately notify the department, upon forms provided by department, of any change in the physical or chemical properties of the residual waste, including leachability; and the department shall conduct an investigation and order necessary corrective action. Upon receipt of a signed, written complaint of any person whose health, safety or welfare may be adversely affected by a physical or chemical change in the properties of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed, including leachability, the department shall determine the validity of the complaint and take appropriate action[.];(19) ensure that there is no land application of biosolids if the maximum contaminant levels for perfluorooctane sulfonate and perfluorooctanoic acid established by the Environmental Quality Board are exceeded;(20) ensure that proper resampling and treatment requirements are completed prior to the land application of biosolids if the established maximum contaminant levels for perfluorooctane sulfonate and perfluorooctanoic acid established by the Environmental Quality Board are exceeded; and20260HB2249PN2940 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (21) b ased on the results from samples collected in the previous calendar year under regulations promulgated under section 105(k), issue and post on the department's publicly accessible Internet website an annual report on the prevalence of perfluorooctane sulfonate and perfluorooctanoic acid in biosolids.Section 3. Section 105 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 105. Powers and duties of the Environmental Quality Board.* * *(k) Not later than 500 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate final regulations establishing sampling requirements and maximum contaminant levels for the presence of perfluorooctane sulfonate and perfluorooctanoic acid in biosolids that are authorized by the department for use in this Commonwealth. The regulations shall require a permit holder with a land application of sewage sludge permit issued by the department under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 271 Subch. J (relating to beneficial use of sewage sludge by land application) to:(1) Conduct quarterly sampling to ensure compliance with established maximum contaminant levels.(2) Complete resampling and treatment prior to land application of biosolids if the established maximum contaminant levels for perfluorooctane sulfonate and perfluorooctanoic acid are exceeded.(3) Report information relating to the sampling, resampling and treatment to the department.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2249PN2940 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930